Hawaii statutes.
[Part XLII.] stroke care

[§321-531] Definitions. As
used in this part, unless the context requires otherwise:

"Department" means the department of health.

"Stroke coalition" means a
multi-organizational process of public, private, and nonprofit organizations
working together for a common purpose to improve stroke outcomes throughout the
State.

"Stroke database" means a stroke
coalition-approved, existing, nationally recognized and validated data platform
available to the department and all participating hospitals statewide and that
has features to maintain confidentiality standards and data security. [L 2015,
c 211, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol06_Ch0321-0344
Next